Utah statutes.
23-20-3.5.    Taking protected wildlife while trespassing -- Penalty.

(1) A person may not take or permit his dog to take, while in violation of Subsection 23-20-14(2):

(a)  protected wildlife or their parts;

(b)  an occupied nest of protected wildlife; or

(c)  an egg of protected wildlife.

(2)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if he or she violates any provision of Subsection (1).

